California statutes. Education Code
(e) For purposes of this section, “chartering authority” means a school district, county board of education, or the state board, that granted the charter to the charter school.

(f) For purposes of this section, “revenue of the charter school” means the amount received in the current fiscal year from the local control funding formula calculated pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03.

(g) For purposes of this section, “costs of supervisorial oversight” include, but are not limited to, costs incurred pursuant to Section 47607.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 33, Sec. 38.   (SB 859)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

47613.1.

(a) The Superintendent shall make all of the following apportionments on behalf of a charter school in a school district in which all schools have been converted to charter schools pursuant to Section 47606:

(1) From funds appropriated to Section A of the State School Fund for apportionment for that fiscal year pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 42238) of Chapter 7 of Part 24 of Division 3, an amount for each unit of current fiscal year regular average daily attendance in the charter school multiplied by the funding rates calculated pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, except that average daily attendance generated by pupils who are
 residents of the school district may be funded pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.05.

(2) For each pupil enrolled in the charter school who is entitled to special education services, the state and federal funds for special education services for that pupil that would have been apportioned for that pupil to the school district to which the charter petition was submitted.

(3) Funds for the programs described in former clause (i) of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 54761, as that section read on June 30, 2005, and Sections 63000 and 64000, to the extent that any pupil enrolled in the charter school is eligible to participate.

(b) Transfers of funding in lieu of property taxes pursuant to Section 47635 shall not apply to a school district in which all schools have
 been converted to charter schools pursuant to Section 47606.

(c) For each pupil residing in the school district and receiving instruction provided by the county office of education, a school district in which all schools have been converted to charter schools shall, for purposes of Section 2576, be treated as a school district in which all schools have not been converted to charter schools.

(d) The provisions of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 42238.02 that cap the percentage of unduplicated pupils used for calculating the concentration grant add-on to the percentage of unduplicated pupils of the school district in which the charter school is physically located shall not apply to a school district described in this section.

(e) Consistent with Section 47630, necessary small school
 funding shall not be provided to a school district described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 33, Sec. 39.   (SB 859)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

47614.

(a) The intent of the people in amending Section 47614 is that public school facilities should be shared fairly among all public school pupils, including those in charter schools. 

(b) Each school district shall make available, to each charter school operating in the school district, facilities sufficient for the charter school to accommodate all of the charter school’s in-district students in conditions reasonably equivalent to those in which the students would be accommodated if they were attending other public schools of the district. Facilities provided shall be contiguous, furnished, and equipped, and shall remain the property of the school district. The school district shall make reasonable efforts to provide the charter school with facilities near to where the charter school wishes to locate, and shall not move the charter school unnecessarily. 

(1) The school district may charge the charter school a pro rata share (based on the ratio of space allocated by the school district to the charter school divided by the total space of the district) of those school district facilities costs which the school district pays for with unrestricted general fund revenues. The charter school shall not be otherwise charged for use of the facilities. No school district shall be required to use unrestricted general fund revenues to rent, buy, or lease facilities for charter school students. 

(2) Each year each charter school desiring facilities from a school district in which it is operating shall provide the school district with a reasonable projection of the charter school’s average daily classroom attendance by in-district students for the following year. The district shall allocate facilities to the charter school for that following year based upon this projection. If the charter school, during that following year, generates less average daily classroom attendance by in-district students than it projected, the charter school shall reimburse the district for the over-allocated space at rates to be set by the State Board of Education.

(3) Each school district’s responsibilities under this section shall take effect three years from the effective date of the measure which added this subparagraph, or if the school district passes a school bond measure prior to that time on the first day of July next following such passage. 

(4) Facilities requests based upon projections of fewer than 80 units of average daily classroom attendance for the year may be denied by the school district. 

(5) The term “operating,” as used in this section, shall mean either currently providing public education to in-district students, or having identified at least 80 in-district students who are meaningfully interested in enrolling in the charter school for the following year. 

(6) The State Department of Education shall propose, and the State Board of Education may adopt, regulations implementing this subdivision, including but not limited to defining the terms “average daily classroom attendance,” “conditions reasonably equivalent,” “in-district students,” “facilities costs,” as well as defining the procedures and establishing timelines for the request for, reimbursement for, and provision of, facilities.

(History: Amended November 7, 2000, by initiative Proposition 39, Sec. 6.   Note: Prop. 39 is titled the Smaller Classes, Safer Schools and Financial Accountability Act.)
-------------------------------------------

47614.5.

(a) The Charter School Facility Grant Program is hereby established, and shall be administered by the California School Finance Authority. The grant program is intended to provide assistance with facilities rent and lease costs for pupils in charter schools.

(b) (1) Commencing with the 2017–18 fiscal year, and subject to available funding in the annual Budget Act, eligible charter schools shall receive an amount equivalent to one of the following, whichever is less:

(A) Seventy-five percent of annual facilities rent and lease costs for the charter school.

(B) For the 2017–18 fiscal year, an amount equal to one
 thousand one hundred seventeen dollars ($1,117) per unit of average daily attendance, as certified at the second principal apportionment. Commencing with the 2018–19 fiscal year, the amount of funding provided per unit of average daily attendance in the preceding fiscal year, as adjusted by the percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the prior fiscal year. This percentage change shall be determined using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year compared with the annual average value of the same deflator for the 12-month period ending in the third quarter of the second preceding fiscal year, using the latest data available as of May 10 of the preceding fiscal year, as reported by the Department of Finance.

(2) In any fiscal year, if the funds appropriated for purposes of this section by the annual Budget Act are insufficient to fully fund the approved amounts, the California School Finance Authority shall apportion the available funds on a pro rata basis.

(c) For purposes of this section, the California School Finance Authority shall do all of the following:

(1) Inform charter schools of the grant program.

(2) Upon application by a charter school, determine eligibility, based on the geographic location of the
 charter schoolsite, pupil eligibility for free or reduced-price meals, and a preference in admissions, as appropriate. Eligibility for funding shall not be limited to the grade level or levels served by the school whose attendance area is used to determine eligibility. A charter schoolsite is eligible for funding pursuant to this section if the charter schoolsite meets either of the following conditions:

(A) The charter schoolsite is physically located in the attendance area of a public elementary school in which 55 percent or more of the pupil enrollment is eligible for free or reduced-price meals and the charter schoolsite gives a preference in admissions to pupils who are currently enrolled in that public elementary school and to pupils who reside in the elementary school attendance area where the charter schoolsite is located.

(B) Fifty-five percent or more of the pupil
 enrollment at the charter schoolsite is eligible for free or reduced-price meals.

(3) Inform charter schools of their grant eligibility.

(4) Make apportionments to a charter school for eligible expenditures according to the following schedule:

(A) An initial apportionment by October 31 of each fiscal year, provided the charter school has submitted a timely application for funding, as determined by the California School Finance Authority. The initial apportionment shall be 50 percent of the charter school’s estimated annual entitlement as determined by this section.

(B) A second apportionment by March 1 of each fiscal year. This apportionment shall be 75 percent of the charter school’s estimated annual entitlement, as adjusted for any revisions in cost, enrollment, and other data relevant to computing the charter school’s annual entitlement, less any funding already apportioned to the charter school.

(C) A third apportionment within 30 days
 of the end of each fiscal year or 30 days after receiving the data and documentation needed to compute the charter school’s total annual entitlement, whichever is later. This apportionment shall be the charter school’s total annual entitlement less any funding already apportioned to the charter school.

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the initial apportionment in the 2013–14 fiscal year shall be made by October 15, 2013, or 105 days after enactment of the Budget Act of 2013, whichever is later.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) The California School Finance Authority shall use prior year data on pupil eligibility for free or reduced-price meals to determine eligibility pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c). A new charter school that was not operational in the prior year shall be eligible in the
 current year if it meets the free or reduced-price meal eligibility requirements specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) based on current year data. Prior year rent or lease costs provided by charter schools shall be used to determine eligibility for the grant program until actual rent or lease costs become known or until June 30 of each fiscal year.

(2) If prior year rent or lease costs are unavailable, and the current year lease and rent costs are not immediately available, the California School Finance Authority shall use rent or lease cost estimates provided by the charter school.

(3) (A) The California School Finance Authority shall verify costs associated with facility rents or leases, as evidenced by an executed rental or lease agreement.

(B) The verified facility agreement shall be subject to either of the following conditions:

(i) Reimbursable facility rent or lease costs do not exceed the prior year’s costs on file with the authority as of the 2016–17 fiscal year, subject to a cost-of-living adjustment consistent with subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(ii) The rent or lease costs of new facility agreements are at or below market rate based on an independent appraisal paid for by the charter school.

(4) The California School Finance Authority shall verify that the grant amount awarded to each charter school is consistent with eligibility requirements as specified in this section and in regulations adopted by the authority. If it is determined by the California School Finance Authority that a charter school did not receive the proper grant award amount, either the charter school shall transfer funds back to the authority as necessary within 60 days of being notified by the authority, or the authority shall provide an additional apportionment as necessary to the charter school within 60 days of notifying the charter school, subject to the availability of funds.

(e) Funds appropriated for purposes of this section shall not be apportioned for any of the following:

(1) Units of average daily attendance generated through nonclassroom-based instruction as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 47612.5 or that does not comply with conditions or limitations set forth in regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to this section.

(2) Charter schools occupying existing school district or county office of education facilities, except that charter schools shall be eligible for the portions of their facilities that are not existing school district or county office of education facilities.

(3) Charter schools receiving reasonably equivalent facilities from their chartering authorities pursuant to Section
 47614, except that charter schools shall be eligible for the portions of their facilities that are not reasonably equivalent facilities received from their chartering authorities.

(f) Funds appropriated for purposes of this section shall first be used for costs associated with facilities rents and leases, consistent with the definitions used in the California School Accounting Manual or regulations adopted by the California School Finance Authority. These funds also may be used for costs, including, but not limited to, costs associated with remodeling buildings, deferred maintenance, initially installing or extending service systems and other built-in equipment, and improving sites.

(g) If an existing charter school located in an elementary attendance area in which less than
 50 percent of pupil enrollment is eligible for free or reduced-price meals relocates to an attendance area identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), admissions preference shall be given to pupils who reside in the elementary school attendance area into which the charter school is relocating.

(h) The California School Finance Authority annually shall report to the department and the Director of Finance, and post information on its Internet Web site, regarding the use of funds that have been made available during the fiscal year to each charter school pursuant to the grant program.

(i) The California School Finance Authority shall annually allocate the facilities grants to eligible charter schools according to the schedule in paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) for the current school year rent and lease costs.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature that the funding level for the Charter School Facility Grant Program for the 2012–13 fiscal year be considered the base level of funding for subsequent fiscal years.

(k) The Controller shall include instructions appropriate to the enforcement of this section in the audit guide required by subdivision (a) of Section 14502.1.

(l) The California School Finance Authority, effective with the 2013–14 fiscal year, shall be considered the senior creditor for purposes of satisfying audit findings pursuant to the audit
 instructions to be developed pursuant to subdivision (k).

(m) The California School Finance Authority may adopt regulations to implement this section. Any regulations adopted pursuant to this section may be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

(n) Notwithstanding any other law, a charter school shall be subject, with regard to this section, to audit conducted pursuant to Section 41020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 42.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

47615.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) Charter schools are part of the Public School System, as defined in Article IX of the California Constitution.

(2) Charter schools are under the jurisdiction of the Public School System and the exclusive control of the officers of the public schools, as provided in this part.

(3) Charter schools shall be entitled to full and fair funding, as provided in this part.

(b) This part shall be liberally construed to effectuate the findings and declarations set forth in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 34, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Notice [47616.5. - 47616.7.]

47616.5.

The Legislative Analyst shall contract for a neutral evaluator to conduct an evaluation of the effectiveness of the charter school approach authorized under this part. On or before July 1, 2003, the neutral evaluator shall report directly to the Legislature and the Governor with recommendations to modify, expand, or terminate the charter school approach. The evaluation of the effectiveness of the charter school approach shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following factors:

(a) If available, the pre- and post-charter school test scores of pupils attending charter schools and other pupil assessment tools.

(b) The level of parental satisfaction with the charter school approach compared with schools within the district in which the charter school is located.

(c) The impact of required parental involvement.

(d) The fiscal structures and practices of charter schools as well as the relationship of these structures and practices to school districts, including the amount of revenue received from various public and private sources.

(e) An assessment of whether or not the charter school approach has resulted in increased innovation and creativity.

(f) Opportunities for teachers under the charter school approach.

(g) Whether or not there is an increased focus on low-achieving and gifted pupils.

(h) Any discrimination and segregation in charter schools.

(i) If available, the number of charter school petitions submitted to governing boards of school districts and the number of those proposals that are denied, per year, since the enactment of the charter school law, including the reasons why the governing boards denied these petitions, and the reasons governing boards have revoked charters.

(j) The governance, fiscal liability and accountability practices and related issues between charter schools and the governing boards of the school districts approving their charters.

(k) The manner in which governing boards of school districts monitor the compliance of the conditions, standards, and procedures entered into under a charter.

(l) The extent of the employment of noncredentialed personnel in charter schools.

(m) An assessment of how the exemption from laws governing school districts allows charter schools to operate differently than schools operating under those laws.

(n) A comparison in each school district that has a charter school of the pupil dropout rate in the charter schools and in the noncharter schools.

(o) The role and impact of collective bargaining on charter schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 673, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

47616.7.

The evaluation provided for in Section 47616.5 shall include an analysis of the funding system for charter schools that offer nonclassroom-based instruction. The evaluation shall also examine the effectiveness of the State Board of Education’s process, as provided for in Sections 47612.5 and 47634.2, for approving funding for charter schools offering nonclassroom-based instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 892, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. University Charter Schools [47620. - 47626.]



  ARTICLE 1. University of California at Los Angeles Elementary Charter School [47620. - 47625.]

47620.

An elementary school that has been operated by the University of California at the Los Angeles campus prior to January 1, 1994, may apply to become a charter school under this chapter. The school may apply under either Section 47621 or Section 47622. If a charter is granted under this chapter, the resulting charter school shall be part of the public school system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

47621.

An elementary school that meets the requirements of Section 47620 may apply to become a charter school by petitioning the governing board of the local school district and otherwise following the procedures and requirements contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 47605) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 47610).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

47622.

As an alternative to Section 47621, an elementary school that meets the requirements of Section 47620 may apply to become a charter school by petitioning the State Board of Education. Under this section, the petition shall be signed by not less than 50 percent of the school’s currently employed teachers. All other procedures and requirements, other than those prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 47605, that are contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 47605) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 47610) are applicable to a petition filed pursuant to this section except that references to “governing board” shall mean the State Board of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

47624.

If a charter is granted under this chapter, the University of California shall continue to own and be liable for the resulting charter school to the same extent as before the granting of the charter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

47625.

A charter granted pursuant to Section 47620 shall not become operative before July 1, 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 118, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Employer [47626. - 47626.]

47626.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 47611.5, a charter school operated by the University of California in facilities owned by the Regents of the University of California shall declare in its charter that it is the employer of the employees at the charter school for the purposes of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code. The provisions of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code shall apply to the charter school. A charter school operated by the University of California in facilities owned by the Regents of the University of California may not be deemed a public school employer for the purposes of this chapter.

(b) By March 31, 2000, an existing charter school operated by the University of California shall amend its charter to comply with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 828, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Funding [47630. - 47663.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [47630. - 47632.]

47630.

It is the intent of the Legislature that each charter school be provided with operational funding that is equal to the total funding that would be available to a similar school district serving a similar pupil population, except that a charter school may not be funded as a necessary small school or a necessary small high school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 96.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

47630.5.

(a) This chapter applies to the calculation of operational funding for charter schools. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, this chapter shall apply to all charter schools without regard to their sponsoring local education agency.

(b) Additional legal or fiscal responsibilities on the part of a county superintendent of schools are not imposed by this chapter, except as specifically provided in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 97.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

47631.

(a) Article 3 (commencing with Section 47636) shall not apply to a charter granted pursuant to Section 47605.5.

(b) A charter school authorized pursuant to Section 47605.5 shall receive the average daily attendance rate calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2574 for enrolled pupils who are identified as any of the following:

(1) Probation-referred pursuant to Section 300, 601, 602, or 654 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) On probation or parole and not attending a school.

(3) Expelled for any of
 the reasons specified in subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 48915.

(4) Attending schools or classes established pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 48645) of Chapter 4 of Part 27.

(c) A charter school authorized pursuant to Section 47605.5 shall be funded pursuant to the local control funding formula pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03, for all pupils except for pupils funded pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) A charter school authorized pursuant to Section 47605.5 shall be funded pursuant to the local control funding formula pursuant to Section 2575 for pupils receiving the average daily attendance rate computed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2574 and identified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision
 (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 33, Sec. 40.   (SB 859)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

47632.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall be defined as follows:

(a) “General-purpose entitlement” means an amount computed by the local control funding formula pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03.

(b) “Economic impact aid-eligible pupils” means those pupils that are included in the economic impact aid-eligible pupil count pursuant to Section 54023. For purposes of applying Section 54023 to charter schools, “economically disadvantaged pupils” means the pupils described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 54026.

(c) “General-purpose funding” means those funds that consist of state aid, local property taxes, and other revenues applied toward a school district’s local control funding formula, pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03.

(d) “Categorical aid” means aid that consists of state or federally funded programs, or both, that are apportioned for specific purposes set forth in statute or regulation.

(e) “Educationally disadvantaged pupils” means those pupils who meet federal eligibility criteria for free and reduced-price meals as specified in Section 49531, as that section read on January 1, 2013, except in regard to meals in family day care homes.

(f) “Operational funding” means all funding except
 funding for capital outlay.

(g) “School district of a similar type” means a school district that is serving similar grade levels.

(h) “Similar pupil population” means similar numbers of pupils by grade level, with a similar proportion of educationally disadvantaged pupils.

(i) “Sponsoring local educational agency” means the following:

(1) If a charter school petition is granted by a school district, the sponsoring local educational agency is the school district.

(2) If a charter school petition is granted by a county office of education after having been previously denied by a school district, the
 sponsoring local educational agency means the school district
 that initially denied the charter petition.

(3) If a charter school petition is granted after a local educational agency determination is reversed by the state board, the sponsoring local educational agency means the pupils’ school district of residence if the school district is a basic aid school district. For purposes of this paragraph, “basic aid school district” means a school district that did not receive an apportionment of state funds in the prior fiscal year as described in subdivision (o) of Section 42238.02. The requirements of this paragraph shall not be waived by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or any other law.

(4) For pupils attending county-sponsored charter schools authorized pursuant to Section 47605.5 who do not meet the criteria identified
 in subdivision (b) of Section 47631, the sponsoring local educational agency means the pupils’ school district of residence.

(5) For pupils attending countywide charter schools authorized pursuant to Section 47605.6 who reside in a basic aid school district, the sponsoring local educational agency means the pupils’ school district of residence. For purposes of this paragraph, “basic aid school district” means a school district that did not receive an apportionment of state funds as described in subdivision (o) of Section 42238.02 in the prior fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 49.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Charter School Block Grant [47633. - 47635.]

47633.

The Superintendent shall annually compute a general-purpose entitlement, funded from a combination of state aid and local funds, for each charter school as follows:

(a) The Superintendent shall annually compute the statewide average amount of general-purpose funding per unit of average daily attendance received by school districts for each of four grade level ranges: kindergarten and grades 1, 2, and 3; grades 4, 5, and 6; grades 7 and 8; and, grades 9 to 12, inclusive. For purposes of making these computations, both of the following conditions shall apply:

(1) Revenue limit funding attributable to pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 5, inclusive, shall equal the statewide average revenue limit funding per unit of
 average daily attendance received by elementary school districts; revenue limit funding attributable to pupils in grades 6, 7, and 8, shall equal the statewide average revenue limit funding per unit of average daily attendance received by unified school districts; and revenue limit funding attributable to pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, shall equal the statewide average revenue limit funding per unit of average daily attendance received by high school districts.

(2) Revenue limit funding received by school districts shall exclude the value of any benefit attributable to the presence of necessary small schools or necessary small high schools within the school district.

(b) The Superintendent shall multiply each of the four amounts computed in subdivision (a) by the charter school’s average daily attendance in the corresponding grade level ranges. The resulting figure shall be
 the amount of the charter school’s general-purpose entitlement, which shall be funded through a combination of state aid and local funds. From funds appropriated for this purpose pursuant to Section 14002, the Superintendent shall apportion to each charter school this amount, less local funds allocated to the charter school pursuant to Section 47635 and any amount received pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(c) General-purpose entitlement funding may be used for any public school purpose determined by the governing body of the charter school.

(d) Commencing with the 2013–14 fiscal year, this section shall be used only for purposes of allocating revenues received pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 36 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2033, and, as of January 1, 2034, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that becomes operative on or before January 1, 2034, deletes or extends the dates on which it becomes inoperative and is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 43.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.   Inoperative July 1, 2033.    Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

47634.2.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the amount of funding to be allocated to a charter school on the basis of average daily attendance that is generated by pupils engaged in nonclassroom-based instruction, as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 47612.5, including funding provided on the basis of average daily attendance pursuant to Sections 47613.1, 47633, 47634, and 47664, shall be adjusted by the State Board of Education. The State Board of Education shall adopt regulations setting
 forth criteria for the determination of funding for nonclassroom-based instruction, at a minimum the regulation shall specify that the nonclassroom-based instruction is conducted for the instructional benefit of the pupil and substantially dedicated to that function. In developing these criteria and determining the amount of funding to be allocated to a charter school pursuant to this section, the State Board of Education shall consider, among other factors it deems appropriate, the amount of the charter school’s total budget expended on certificated employee salaries and benefits and on schoolsites, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 47612.5, and the teacher-to-pupil ratio in the school.

(2) For the 2001–02 fiscal year only, the amount of funding determined by the State Board of Education pursuant to this section shall not be less than 90 percent of the unadjusted amount to which a charter school would otherwise be
 entitled on the basis of average daily attendance.

(3) For the 2002-03 fiscal year, the amount of funding determined by the State Board of Education pursuant to this section shall not be more than 80 percent of the unadjusted amount to which a charter school would otherwise be entitled, unless the State Board of Education determines that a greater or lesser amount is appropriate based on the criteria specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(4) For the 2003–04 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the amount of funding determined by the State Board of Education pursuant to this section shall not be more than 70 percent of the unadjusted amount to which a charter school would otherwise be entitled, unless the State Board of Education determines that a greater or lesser amount is appropriate based on the criteria specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(5) This section does not authorize the board to adjust the amount of funding a charter school receives on the basis of average daily attendance generated through classroom-based instruction, as defined for purposes of calculating average daily attendance for classroom-based instruction apportionments by paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 47612.5.

(b) (1) The State Board of Education shall appoint an advisory committee to recommend criteria to the board in accordance with this section if it has not done so by the effective date of the act adding this section. The advisory committee shall include, but is not limited to, representatives from school district superintendents, charter schools, teachers, parents, members of the governing boards of school districts, county superintendents of schools, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(2) If a charter school submits a substantially complete request for a determination for funding by February 13, 2002, and the State Board of Education does not act on that request by March 19, 2002, full funding is automatically granted for the 2001–02 fiscal year, but the charter school shall reapply for a determination for funding for the 2002–03 fiscal year.

(3) The determination for funding shall be on a percentage basis and the superintendent shall implement the determination for funding by reducing the charter school’s reported average daily attendance by the determination for funding percentage specified by the State Board of Education.

(4) If the State Board of Education denies request for a determination for funding or provides a reduction as authorized by subdivision (a), the board shall, in writing, give the
 reasons for its denial or reduction and, if appropriate, may describe how any deficiencies or problems may be addressed.

(c) Each charter school offering nonclassroom-based instruction shall, in each report provided to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for apportionment purposes, identify the portion of its average daily attendance that is generated through nonclassroom-based instruction as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 47612.5.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, charter schools shall be subject, with regard to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 47612.5 and this section, to audits conducted pursuant to Section 41020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

47634.4.

(a) A charter school that elects to receive its funding directly, pursuant to Section 47651, may apply individually for federal and state categorical programs, not excluded in this section, but only to the extent it is eligible for funding and meets the provisions of the program. For purposes of determining eligibility for, and allocation of, state or federal categorical aid, a charter school that applies individually shall be deemed to be a school district, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(b) A charter school that does not elect to receive its funding directly, pursuant to Section 47651, may apply, in cooperation with its chartering authority, for federal and state categorical programs not specified in this section, but only to the extent it is
 eligible for funding and meets the provisions of the program.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a charter school shall not apply directly for categorical programs for which services are exclusively or almost exclusively provided by a county office of education.

(d) Consistent with subdivision (c), a charter school shall not receive direct funding for any of the following county-administered categorical programs:

(1) American Indian Education Centers.
